North Dakota statutes. TITLE 4 Agriculture
CHAPTER 4-10.4 Barley [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18]

4-10.4-01.
Definitions. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.4-02.
Policy of state. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.4-03.
Council — Membership — Election — Term. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.4-04.
Barley districts — Establishment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.4-05.
Meetings — Quorum — Compensation and expenses of council. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.4-06.
Expenditure of funds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.4-07.
Council powers and duties. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.4-08.
Tax levied. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.4-09.
Nonparticipating growers — Refunds. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.4-10.
Referendum by growers. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.4-11.
Collection of unpaid taxes. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.4-12.
Penalty for nonpayment of tax. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.4-13.
Records of council — Inspection. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.

4-10.4-14.
Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2009, ch. 80, § 18.